Massachusetts, session 194th, H4768.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1.  (a) As used in this section, the following words shall, unless the context 
clearly requires otherwise, have the following meanings: 
“Affordable housing”, the development of multi-family housing 100 per cent of which 
shall be affordable to households with incomes at or below 80 per cent of the area median 
income, adjusted for household size. 
“Community multi-services center”, a location for the provision of services to the public, 
which may include, but shall not be limited to, the distribution of food, meals and clothing and 
the provision of childcare and vocational training. 
(b)  Notwithstanding sections 32 to 37, inclusive, of chapter 7C of the General Laws or 
any other general or special law to the contrary, the commissioner of capital asset management 
and maintenance, in consultation with the president of Massasoit Community College, may 
convey a certain parcel of land in the city of Brockton described in subsection (c) to Catholic 

of 6 13 Charitable Bureau of the Archdiocese of Boston, Inc. for the purposes of affordable housing and 
a community multi-services center. The parcel shall be conveyed by deed without warranties or 
representations by the commonwealth.  
(c) The parcel that may be conveyed by the division of capital asset management and 
maintenance pursuant to subsection (b) is more particularly shown as the land bounded by 
Beaumont avenue, Quincy street, Cresent street and Burrill avenue, also known as Christo’s way, 
on a on a plan of land, on file with the division of capital asset management and maintenance, 
entitled “Plan of Land 782 Crescent Street Brockton, Mass.” prepared for the commonwealth of 
Massachusetts division of capital asset management and maintenance on behalf of Massasoit 
Community College and dated October 4, 2013. The exact location and boundaries of the parcel 
shall be determined by the commissioner. 
(d) The deed or other instrument conveying the parcel pursuant to subsection (b) shall 
provide that the parcel shall be used solely for the purposes of affordable housing and a 
community multi-service center. Any such deed or instrument shall include a reversionary clause 
that stipulates that if the parcel ceases at any time to be used for those allowed purposes, title to 
the parcel shall, at the election of the commonwealth, revert to the commonwealth and the 
reversionary clause shall be enforceable notwithstanding the time limit set forth in section 7 of 
chapter 184A of the General Laws. The reversionary clause shall require a reasonable notice and 
cure period to cure any default. 
(e) The consideration for the conveyance authorized in this section shall be $1. 
(f)(1) If Catholic Charitable Bureau of the Archdiocese of Boston, Inc. does not complete 
a purchase of the parcel pursuant to subsection (b) on or before December 31, 2030, or such time 

of 6 35 as mutually agreed to by Catholic Charitable Bureau of the Archdiocese of Boston, Inc. and the 
commissioner of capital asset management and maintenance, then, notwithstanding sections 32 
to 37, inclusive, of chapter 7C of the General Laws or any other general or special law to the 
contrary, the commissioner of capital asset management and maintenance may sell or lease for a 
term up to 99 years, including all renewals and extensions, or otherwise grant, convey or transfer 
to purchasers or lessees an interest in the property or portions thereof, for such purposes and on 
such terms and conditions as the commissioner of capital asset management and maintenance 
considers appropriate. The parcel shall be conveyed by deed without warranties or 
representations by the commonwealth.  
(2) In making any disposition authorized pursuant to paragraph (1), the commissioner of 
capital asset management and maintenance shall use appropriate competitive bidding processes 
and procedures. Not less than 30 days before the date on which bids, proposals or other offers to 
purchase or lease the property or any portion thereof are due, the commissioner of capital asset 
management and maintenance shall place a notice in the central register published by the state 
secretary pursuant to section 20A of chapter 9 of the General Laws stating the availability of the 
property, the nature of the competitive bidding process, including the time, place and manner for 
the submission of bids and proposals and the opening of the bids or proposals and such other 
information as the commissioner considers relevant.   
(3) Before completing any disposition pursuant to this subsection, the commissioner of 
capital asset management and maintenance shall commission an independent appraisal prepared 
in accordance with the usual and customary professional appraisal practice by a qualified 
appraiser. The commissioner of capital asset management and maintenance shall submit any 
appraisals to the inspector general for review and comment. The inspector general shall review 

of 6 58 and approve any appraisals and the review shall include an examination of the methodology 
utilized for the appraisals. The inspector general shall prepare a report of such review and file the 
report with the commissioner of capital asset management and maintenance for submission by 
the commissioner of capital asset management and maintenance to the house and senate 
committees on ways and means and the joint committee on state administration and regulatory 
oversight. The commissioner shall submit copies of the appraisals and the inspector general’s 
report to the house and senate committees on ways and means and the joint committee on state 
administration and regulatory oversight not less than 15 days before the execution of the 
instrument effecting any disposition made pursuant to this subsection.  If the consideration for 
the parcel to be conveyed is less than the fair market value, the commissioner shall place notice 
in the central register of the conveyance, the amount of the transaction and the difference 
between the calculated value and the price received.  
SECTION 2. (a) Notwithstanding sections 32 to 37, inclusive, of chapter 7C of the 
General Laws or any other general or special law to the contrary, the commissioner of capital 
asset management and maintenance, in consultation with the president of Massasoit Community 
College, may convey certain parcels of land located within the city of Brockton described in 
subsection (b) to the city of Brockton for redevelopment purposes. The parcels shall be conveyed 
by deed without warranties or representations by the commonwealth.  
(b) The parcels that may conveyed by the division of capital asset management and 
maintenance pursuant to this section are more particularly shown as “Area 3.818 Acres” on a 
plan of land, on file with the division of capital asset management and maintenance, entitled 
“Plan of Land in Brockton, Mass. drawn for Christo’s Incorporated” and dated March 23, 1977 

of 6 80 and revised February 1, 1996. The exact location and boundaries of any parcel shall be 
determined by the commissioner.  
(c) Consideration for the conveyance authorized in this section shall be $1. 
(d) The city of Brockton may sell or lease the parcels described in this section for 
redevelopment. If the city of Brockton sells or leases any portion of the parcels, the net proceeds 
from such sale or lease, as determined by the city of Brockton and agreed to by the commissioner 
of capital asset management and maintenance, shall be allocated between the city of Brockton 
and the commonwealth in equal shares; provided, however, that the commissioner may agree to 
reduce the share of the commonwealth’s proceeds to not less than 40 per cent of the net proceeds 
to provide certain incentives to the city of Brockton to sell or lease the parcels expeditiously. If 
the net proceeds, as so determined, are a negative amount, the commonwealth shall not be 
required to make any payments to the city of Brockton.  
SECTION 3. Notwithstanding sections 32 to 37, inclusive, of chapter 7C of the General 
Laws or any general or special law to the contrary, the commissioner of capital asset 
management and maintenance, in consultation with the mayor of the city of Brockton and the 
Old Colony Planning Council, established in chapter 332 of the acts of 1967, may, for no 
consideration, convey to the city of Brockton any portion of parcels shown on the city of 
Brockton assessor’s map as parcels 143-080, 143-079 and 143-081 adjacent to Quincy street in 
the city of Brockton that may be necessary for vehicle safety, addition of a turning lane and 
improving vehicle access to the entrance to Massasoit Community College. The exact location 
100 and boundaries of the parcels to be conveyed shall be determined by the commissioner of capital 
101 asset management and maintenance.  

of 6 102  SECTION 4. The grantee or lessee of any real property disposed of pursuant to this act 
103 shall be responsible for all costs relating to the conveyance, including, but not limited to, 
104 appraisals, surveys, plans, recordings and any other expenses, as shall be deemed necessary by 
105 the commissioner. The grantee or lessee shall acquire the property thereon in its present 
106 condition. Upon the recording of the deed conveying the parcel to a grantee, said grantee shall be 
107 responsible for all costs, liabilities and expenses for its ownership.  
108  SECTION 5. The commonwealth’s share of the net proceeds of the sale or lease of any 
109 parcel, or any portion thereof, pursuant to this act shall be deposited into an expendable trust 
110 established on behalf of Massasoit Community College pursuant to section 6 of chapter 6A of 
111 the General Laws and 801 CMR 50.00. The funds deposited into the trust may be expended for 
112 capital repairs and improvements to facilities on the campus of Massasoit Community College, 
113 including, but not limited to, deferred maintenance, decarbonization or other capital investments, 
114 as determined by the commissioner and the president of Massasoit Community College and 
115 approved by the secretary of administration and finance.